District of Columbia statutes.
22-1715

Repealed

Presence in illegal establishments.

Repealed.

Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 110(a), 41 DCR 2608
Former § 22-1515 had also been amended by D.C. Law 10-119, § 9(b).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 110(a) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
1981 Ed., § 22-1515.